da: Medfølgende tilbehør til basblokfløjte: S-rør (buet); S-rør (lige); Bæretaske; Rensestok; Renseklud; Korkfedt; Grebstabel; Gigbag; Hard case; Instrumentstativ; Udskifteligt sæt med s-rør; Samlingsfedt; Halsrem; Tommelfingerstøtte; Andet
nb: Bassblokkfløyte inkludert tilbehør: Bokal (buet); Bokal (rett); Bæreveske; Pussestokk; Pusseklut; Korkfett; Grepstabell; Gigbag; Hardt etui; Instrumentstativ; Utskiftbart bokalsett; Skjøtefett; Nakkestropp; Tommelstøtte; Annet
it: Flauto basso con accessori inclusi: Esse (curva); Esse (dritta); Custodia per il trasporto; Asta di pulizia; Panno di pulizia; Grasso per sughero; Tavola delle diteggiature; Gig bag; Custodia rigida; Supporto per strumento; Set di esse intercambiabili; Grasso per innesti; Cinghia da collo; Poggiadito; Altro
sl-SI: Priložena oprema za basovsko kljunasto flavto: Cevka (ukrivljena); Cevka (ravna); Kovček za prenašanje; Čistilna palčka; Čistilna krpica; Mast za pluto; Tabela prijemov; Mehka torba; Trdi kovček; Stojalo za instrument; Komplet zamenljivih cevk; Mast za spoje; Vratni trak; Naslon za palec; Drugo
pl: Akcesoria do fletu prostego basowego w zestawie: Es (zakrzywione); Es (proste); Futerał; Wycior; Ściereczka do czyszczenia; Smar do korka; Tabela palcowania; Pokrowiec; Twardy futerał; Statyw na instrument; Zestaw wymiennych esów; Smar do łączeń; Pasek na szyję; Podpórka pod kciuk; Inne
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมที่มีให้ในรีคอร์เดอร์เบส: ท่อลม (โค้ง); ท่อลม (ตรง); กระเป๋าใส่เครื่องดนตรี; ไม้ล้างท่อลม; ไม้พันสำลีทำความสะอาด; จาระบีคอร์ก; แผนผังการวางนิ้ว; กระเป๋ากิกแบ็ก; เคสแข็ง; ขาตั้งเครื่องดนตรี; ชุดท่อลมแบบถอดเปลี่ยนได้; จาระบีทาข้อต่อ; สายคล้องคอ; ที่พักนิ้วหัวแม่มือ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Flauta de bisel de baixo com acessórios incluídos: Bocal (curvo); Bocal (reto); Estojo de transporte; Vareta de limpeza; Pano de limpeza; Massa para cortiça; Gráfico de dedilhado; Saco de transporte; Estojo rígido; Suporte de instrumento; Conjunto de bocal intercambiável; Massa de junção; Correia de pescoço; Apoio de polegar; Outro
es: Accesorios incluidos con la flauta dulce bajo: Tudel (curvo); Tudel (recto); Estuche de transporte; Varilla de limpieza; Hisopo de limpieza; Grasa para corcho; Tabla de digitación; Funda blanda; Estuche rígido; Soporte para instrumento; Juego de tudeles intercambiables; Grasa para juntas; Correa para el cuello; Apoyapulgar; Otro
hr-HR: Uključeni pribor za bas-blokflautu: Lulica (zakrivljena); Lulica (ravna); Kovčeg za nošenje; Šipka za čišćenje; Krpica za čišćenje; Mast za pluto; Tablica prstohvata; Prijenosna torba; Tvrdi kovčeg; Stalak za instrument; Set izmjenjivih lulica; Mast za spojeve; Remen za vrat; Oslonac za palac; Ostalo
zh-TW: 低音木笛包含配件: 吹管 (彎式); 吹管 (直式); 攜帶盒; 清潔棒; 通條布; 軟木膏; 指法表; 琴袋; 硬殼盒; 樂器架; 可互換吹管套件; 接頭潤滑膏; 頸帶; 拇指靠座; 其他
cs: Obsažené příslušenství k basové zobcové flétně: Krk (zahnutý); Krk (rovný); Přenosné pouzdro; Vytěrák; Vytěrák; Mazivo na korek; Tabulka hmatů; Obal; Pevné pouzdro; Stojan na nástroj; Sada vyměnitelných krků; Mazivo na spoje; Popruh na krk; Opěrka palce; Jiné
el: Αξεσουάρ που περιλαμβάνονται για φλογέρα bass recorder: Λαιμός (καμπυλωτός); Λαιμός (ίσιος); Θήκη μεταφοράς; Ράβδος καθαρισμού; Πανάκι καθαρισμού; Γράσο για φελλό; Διάγραμμα δακτυλισμών; Μαλακή θήκη; Σκληρή θήκη; Βάση οργάνου; Σετ εναλλάξιμων λαιμών; Γράσο ενώσεων; Λουράκι λαιμού; Στήριγμα αντίχειρα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 低音竖笛附带配件: 吹管（弯形）; 吹管（直形）; 收纳盒; 清洁杆; 清洁通条布; 软木膏; 指法表; 乐器包; 硬盒; 乐器支架; 可互换吹管套件; 接口润滑膏; 颈带; 拇指托; 其他
ko: 포함된 베이스 리코더 액세서리: 보칼(곡선형); 보칼(일자형); 휴대용 케이스; 청소용 막대; 청소용 스와브; 코르크 그리스; 운지법 차트; 긱백; 하드 케이스; 악기 스탠드; 교체형 보칼 세트; 조인트 그리스; 넥 스트랩; 엄지 받침대; 기타
de: Bassblockflöte inklusive Zubehör: S-Bogen (gebogen); S-Bogen (gerade); Tragekoffer; Reinigungsstab; Durchziehwischer; Korkfett; Grifftabelle; Gigbag; Hartschalenkoffer; Instrumentenständer; Set mit austauschbaren S-Bögen; Zapfenfett; Nackengurt; Daumenauflage; Sonstige
ja: ベースリコーダーに含まれるアクセサリー: ボーカル (カーブ); ボーカル (ストレート); キャリングケース; クリーニングロッド; クリーニングスワブ; コルクグリス; 運指表; ギグバッグ; ハードケース; 楽器スタンド; 交換可能ボーカルセット; ジョイントグリス; ネックストラップ; サムレスト; その他
lt-LT: Bosinės išilginės fleitos priedai: Vamzdelis (lenktas); Vamzdelis (tiesus); Krepšys; Valymo grūstuvas; Valymo šluostė; Kamštinis tepalas; Aplikavimo lentelė; Minkštas dėklas; Kietas dėklas; Instrumento stovas; Keičiamų vamzdelių rinkinys; Jungčių tepalas; Kaklo dirželis; Nykščio atrama; Kita
vi: Phụ kiện đi kèm kèn recorder bass: Ống bocal (cong); Ống bocal (thẳng); Hộp đựng; Que vệ sinh; Khăn vệ sinh; Mỡ bôi trơn nút bần; Biểu đồ bấm nốt; Túi đựng nhạc cụ; Hộp cứng; Giá đỡ nhạc cụ; Bộ ống bocal thay thế; Mỡ bôi trơn khớp nối; Dây đeo cổ; Chỗ để ngón cái; Khác
tr: Bas blok flüt aksesuarları: Bocal (kavisli); Bocal (düz); Taşıma çantası; Temizleme çubuğu; Temizleme bezi; Mantar yağı; Parmak pozisyon tablosu; Taşıma kılıfı; Sert kutu; Enstrüman standı; Değiştirilebilir bocal seti; Eklem yağı; Boyun askısı; Başparmak dayanağı; Diğer
nl: Basblokfluit meegeleverde accessoires: Bocal (gebogen); Bocal (recht); Draagkoffer; Wisserstok; Wisser; Kurkvet; Grepentabel; Gigbag; Harde koffer; Instrumentenstandaard; Verwisselbare bocal-set; Tappenvet; Nekriem; Duimsteun; Overig
fr: Accessoires inclus avec la flûte à bec basse: Bocal (courbé); Bocal (droit); Mallette de transport; Tige de nettoyage; Écouvillon de nettoyage; Graisse pour liège; Tablature; Housse; Étui rigide; Support d’instrument; Ensemble de bocaux interchangeables; Graisse pour joints; Cordon; Repose-pouce; Autre
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo k basovej zobcovej flaute v cene: Esíčko (zahnuté); Esíčko (rovné); Puzdro na prenášanie; Čistiaca tyčinka; Čistiaca handrička; Mazivo na korok; Tabuľka hmatov; Taška na nástroj (Gig bag); Pevné puzdro; Stojan na nástroj; Súprava zameniteľných esíčok; Mazivo na spoje; Popruh na krk; Opierka na palec; Iné
sv: Basblockflöjtens medföljande tillbehör: Bokal (böjd); Bokal (rak); Bärväska; Rengöringsstav; Rengöringsduk; Korkfett; Grepptabell; Gigbag; Hårt fodral; Instrumentstativ; Set med utbytbara bokaler; Tappfett; Nackrem; Tumstöd; Övrigt
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари към бас блокфлейтата: Ес (извит); Ес (прав); Калъф за носене; Пръчка за почистване; Кърпа за почистване; Смазка за корк; Таблица с пръстовки; Мек калъф; Твърд калъф; Стойка за инструмент; Комплект сменяеми есове; Смазка за сглобки; Лента за врата; Опора за палеца; Друго
hu: Basszusfelvevő tartozékok: Fúvócső (hajlított); Fúvócső (egyenes); Hordtáska; Tisztítópálca; Tisztítókendő; Parafazsír; Fogástáblázat; Puhatok; Keménytok; Hangszerállvány; Cserélhető fúvócsőkészlet; Illesztékzsír; Nyakpánt; Hüvelykujjtámasz; Egyéb
fi: Bassonokkahuilun mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Puhallusputki (kaareva); Puhallusputki (suora); Kantolaukku; Puhdistuspuikko; Puhdistusliina; Korkkirasva; Sormituskartta; Kantokassi; Kova laukku; Soitinteline; Vaihdettava puhallusputkisarja; Liitosrasva; Kaulahihna; Peukalotuki; Muu
pt-BR: Acessórios incluídos da flauta doce baixo: Bocal (curvo); Bocal (reto); Estojo de transporte; Vareta de limpeza; Pano de limpeza; Graxa para cortiça; Tabela de dedilhado; Gig bag; Estojo rígido; Suporte para instrumento; Conjunto de bocais intercambiáveis; Graxa para encaixes; Correia de pescoço; Apoio de polegar; Outros
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru flautul bas: Tub (curbat); Tub (drept); Carcasă de transport; Tijă de curățare; Tampon de curățare; Vaselină pentru plută; Tabel cu digitații; Husă moale; Carcasă dură; Stativ pentru instrument; Set de tuburi interschimbabile; Vaselină pentru articulații; Curea pentru gât; Suport pentru degetul mare; Altele
ru: Аксессуары в комплекте басовой блокфлейты: Эс (изогнутый); Эс (прямой); Чехол для переноски; Шомпол для чистки; Тампон для чистки; Смазка для пробки; Таблица аппликатуры; Мягкий чехол; Жесткий футляр; Стойка для инструмента; Набор сменных эсов; Смазка для стыков; Шейный ремень; Упор для большого пальца; Другое
en: Bass recorder included accessories: Bocal (curved); Bocal (straight); Carrying case; Cleaning rod; Cleaning swab; Cork grease; Fingering chart; Gig bag; Hard case; Instrument stand; Interchangeable bocal set; Joint grease; Neck strap; Thumb rest; Other